Utah statutes.
63F-1-502.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Center" means the Automated Geographic Reference Center created in Section 63F-1-506.

(2)  "Database" means the State Geographic Information Database created in Section 63F-1-507.

(3)  "Director" means the director appointed in accordance with Section 63F-1-503.

(4)  "Division" means the Division of Integrated Technology created in this part.

(5)  "Geographic Information System" or "GIS" means a computer driven data integration and map production system that interrelates disparate layers of data to specific geographic locations.

(6)  "State Geographic Information Database" means the database created in Section 63F-1-507.

(7)  "Statewide Global Positioning Reference Network" or "network" means the network created in Section 63F-1-509.



Enacted by Chapter 169, 2005 General Session

